Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1285.01
Electronic certificate of title; changes authorized.

Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-1508, if a motorboat certificate of title is an electronic certificate of title record, upon application by an owner or a lienholder and payment of the fee prescribed in section 37-1287, the following changes may be made to a certificate of title electronically and without printing a certificate of title:

(1) Changing the name of an owner to reflect a legal change of name;

(2) Removing the name of an owner with the consent of all owners and lienholders;

(3) Adding an additional owner with the consent of all owners and lienholders; or

(4) Beginning on an implementation date designated by the director on or before January 1, 2022, adding, changing, or removing a transfer-on-death beneficiary designation.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB113, § 1.